Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-21,167
Expedited trial and appeal; advancement.

The district court of Lancaster County shall speedily determine the action, and an appeal may be taken to the Court of Appeals within thirty days after the entry of the judgment. Trial in the appellate court shall in all ways be expedited, set for an early hearing, and advanced as other causes which involve the public welfare and convenience are advanced.

Laws 1929, c. 79, § 3, p. 269;

C.S.1929, § 20-21,158;

R.S.1943, § 25-21,167;

Laws 1991, LB 732, § 67;

Laws 1992, LB 360, § 6;

Laws 2000, LB 921, § 21.